Utah statutes.
52-4-303.   Enforcement of chapter -- Suit to compel compliance.

(1)  The attorney general and county attorneys of the state shall enforce this chapter.

(2)  The attorney general shall, on at least a yearly basis, provide notice to all public bodies that are subject to this chapter of any material changes to the requirements for the conduct of meetings under this chapter.

(3)  A person denied any right under this chapter may commence suit in a court of competent jurisdiction to:

(a)  compel compliance with or enjoin violations of this chapter; or

(b)  determine the chapter's applicability to discussions or decisions of a public body.

(4)  The court may award reasonable attorney fees and court costs to a successful plaintiff.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 14, 2006 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 263, 2006 General Session

